Utah statutes.
53C-3-103.   Disposition of interest on permanent funds.

(1)  The interest and dividends derived from the investment of funds belonging to the permanent State School Fund and the interest, dividends, and other income of the permanent funds of the respective state institutions shall be distributed for use for the maintenance of public elementary and secondary schools or the state institutions in accordance with Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

(2)  Realized and unrealized gains shall be retained in the Permanent State School Fund.

